Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,139
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; relevant information; release to insurer; when.

Any insurer which provides information to an authorized agency pursuant to sections 44-3,134 to 44-3,142 shall have the right to request and receive relevant information from such authorized agency. The authorized agency shall provide the requested relevant information to the insurer or agent authorized by the insurer not more than thirty days after the completion of the agency's investigation.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 6.